Utah statutes.
40-1-9.   County recorder may certify district records.
(1)  When the books, records, and documents pertaining to the office of mining
district recorder have been deposited in the office of a county recorder, the
recorder may make and certify copies from those records.
(2)  Those certified copies shall be receivable in all tribunals and before
all officers of this state in the same manner and to the same effect as if the
records had been originally filed or made in the office of the county
recorder.
